Virginia statutes. Title 4.1. Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Control.
Article 2. Licenses Granted by Board; Limitations; Revocation and Suspension.
§ 4.1-212.
Permits required in certain instances.

The Board may grant the following permits which shall authorize:

Wine and beer salesmen representing any out-of-state wholesaler engaged in the sale of wine and beer, or either, to sell or solicit the sale of wine or beer, or both in the Commonwealth.

Any person having any interest in the manufacture, distribution or sale of spirits or other alcoholic beverages to solicit any mixed beverage licensee, his agent, employee or any person connected with the licensee in any capacity in his licensed business to sell or offer for sale such spirits or alcoholic beverages.

Any person to keep upon his premises alcoholic beverages that he is not authorized by any license to sell and which shall be used for culinary purposes only.

Any person to transport lawfully purchased alcoholic beverages within, into or through the Commonwealth, except that no permit shall be required for any person shipping or transporting into the Commonwealth a reasonable quantity of alcoholic beverages when such person is relocating his place of residence to the Commonwealth in accordance with §

4.1-311

.

Any person to keep, store, or possess any still or distilling apparatus for the purpose of distilling alcohol.

The release of alcoholic beverages not under United States custom bonds or internal revenue bonds stored in Board approved warehouses for delivery to the Board or to persons entitled to receive them within or outside of the Commonwealth.

The release of alcoholic beverages from United States customs bonded warehouses for delivery to the Board or to licensees and other persons enumerated in subsection B of §

4.1-131

.

The release of alcoholic beverages from United States internal revenue bonded warehouses for delivery in accordance with subsection C of §

4.1-132

.

A secured party or any trustee, curator, committee, conservator, receiver or other fiduciary appointed or qualified in any court proceeding, to continue to operate under the licenses previously issued to any deceased or other person licensed to sell alcoholic beverages for such period as the Board deems appropriate.

The one-time sale of lawfully acquired alcoholic beverages belonging to any person, or which may be a part of such person’s estate, including a judicial sale, estate sale, sale to enforce a judgment lien or liquidation sale to satisfy indebtedness secured by a security interest in alcoholic beverages, by a sheriff, personal representative, receiver or other officer acting under authority of a court having jurisdiction in the Commonwealth, or by any secured party as defined in subdivision (a)(73) of §

8.9A-102

of the Virginia Uniform Commercial Code. Such sales shall be made only to persons who are licensed or hold a permit to sell alcoholic beverages in the Commonwealth or to persons outside the Commonwealth for resale outside the Commonwealth and upon such conditions or restrictions as the Board may prescribe.

Any person who purchases at a foreclosure, secured creditor’s or judicial auction sale the premises or property of a person licensed by the Board and who has become lawfully entitled to the possession of the licensed premises to continue to operate the establishment to the same extent as a person holding such licenses for a period not to exceed 60 days or for such longer period as determined by the Board. Such permit shall be temporary and shall confer the privileges of any licenses held by the previous owner to the extent determined by the Board. Such temporary permit may be issued in advance, conditioned on the above requirements.

The storage of lawfully acquired alcoholic beverages not under customs bond or internal revenue bond in warehouses located in the Commonwealth.

The storage of wine by a licensed winery or farm winery under internal revenue bond in warehouses located in the Commonwealth.

Any person to conduct tastings in accordance with §

4.1-201.1

, provided that such person has filed an application for a permit in which the applicant represents (i) that he or she is under contract to conduct such tastings on behalf of the alcoholic beverage manufacturer or wholesaler named in the application; (ii) that such contract grants to the applicant the authority to act as the authorized representative of such manufacturer or wholesaler; and (iii) that such contract contains an acknowledgment that the manufacturer or wholesaler named in the application may be held liable for any violation of §

4.1-201.1

by its authorized representative. A permit issued pursuant to this subdivision shall be valid for at least one year, unless sooner suspended or revoked by the Board in accordance with §

4.1-229

.

Any person who, through contract, lease, concession, license, management or similar agreement (hereinafter referred to as the contract), becomes lawfully entitled to the use and control of the premises of a person licensed by the Board to continue to operate the establishment to the same extent as a person holding such licenses, provided such person has made application to the Board for a license at the same premises. The permit shall (i) confer the privileges of any licenses held by the previous owner to the extent determined by the Board and (ii) be valid for a period of 120 days or for such longer period as may be necessary as determined by the Board pending the completion of the processing of the permittee’s license application. No permit shall be issued without the written consent of the previous licensee. No permit shall be issued under the provisions of this subdivision if the previous licensee owes any state or local taxes, or has any pending charges for violation of this subtitle or any Board regulation, unless the permittee agrees to assume the liability of the previous licensee for the taxes or any penalty for the pending charges. An application for a permit may be filed prior to the effective date of the contract, in which case the permit when issued shall become effective on the effective date of the contract. Upon the effective date of the permit, (a) the permittee shall be responsible for compliance with the provisions of this subtitle and any Board regulation and (b) the previous licensee shall not be held liable for any violation of this subtitle or any Board regulation committed by, or any errors or omissions of, the permittee.

Any sight-seeing carrier or contract passenger carrier as defined in §

46.2-2000

transporting individuals for compensation to a winery, brewery, or restaurant, licensed under this chapter and authorized to conduct tastings, to collect the licensee’s tasting fees from tour participants for the sole purpose of remitting such fees to the licensee.

Any tour company guiding individuals for compensation on a walking tour to one or more establishments licensed to sell alcoholic beverages at retail for on-premises consumption to collect as one fee from tour participants (i) the licensee’s fee for the alcoholic beverages served as part of the tour, (ii) a fee for any food offered as part of the tour, and (iii) a fee for the walking tour service. The tour company shall remit to the licensee any fee collected for the alcoholic beverages and any food served as part of the tour. The tour company shall ensure that (a) each tour includes no more than 15 participants per tour guide and no more than three tour guides, (b) a tour guide is present with the participants throughout the duration of the tour, and (c) all participants are persons to whom alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold.

Nothing in subdivision 9, 10, or 11 shall authorize any brewery, winery or affiliate or a subsidiary thereof which has supplied financing to a wholesale licensee to manage and operate the wholesale licensee in the event of a default, except to the extent authorized by subdivision B 3 a of §

4.1-216

.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 4-26, 4-59, 4-61.2, 4-72, 4-77, 4-86; 1950, p. 879; 1954, cc. 21, 351; 1962, c. 200, § 4-84.1; 1968, c. 7, § 4-98.16; 1972, cc. 138, 717; 1974, c. 460, § 4-72.1; 1975, c. 480; 1976, c. 696; 1978, c. 436; 1984, c. 53; 1986, c. 190; 1988, c. 786; 1990, cc. 442, 773; 1993, cc. 221, 866; 1994, cc. 825, 826; 1997, c. 801; 2003, c. 564; 2006, c. 826; 2008, c. 453; 2012, c. 155; 2014, c. 617; 2017, c. 675; 2020, cc. 386, 816, 1113, 1114; 2022, c. 201.

Editor’s note.

Acts
1993, c. 221 amended former § 4-59, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to
§ 30-152, the
1993 amendment by c. 221 has been given effect in this section as set out above. In accordance with c. 221, “and upon such conditions or restrictions as the Board may prescribe” was added to the last sentence of subdivision 10 of this section.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cl. 4 provides: “That any person licensed to sell wine or beer for on-premises consumption may sell such wine or beer to persons to whom alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold for off-premises consumption until January 1, 2022, provided that such wine or beer is sold in a (i) container upon which the original seal or closure has not been broken; (ii) growler made of glass, ceramic, metal, or other material approved by the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Board); or (iii) reusable, resealable container approved by the Board. Such on-premises licensee, as well as persons licensed to sell wine or beer for off-premises consumption, may deliver wine or beer that it is authorized to sell to consumers within the Commonwealth without obtaining a delivery permit until January 1, 2022, subject to the following conditions: (a) deliveries shall be performed by (1) the licensee, (2) an agent, officer, director, shareholder, or employee of the licensee, or (3) an independent contractor of the licensee, provided that only one individual takes possession of the wine or beer during the course of the delivery and the licensee has entered into a written agreement with the independent contractor establishing that the licensee is vicariously liable for any administrative violations of this enactment or
§

4.1-304

of the Code of Virginia committed by the independent contractor relating to any deliveries made on behalf of the licensee; (b) deliveries may be made without obtaining the recipient’s signature, provided that the person making the delivery records the recipient’s full name and the method used to verify that the recipient is 21 years of age or older; (c) the delivery shall be refused when the recipient appears to be younger than 21 years of age and refuses to present valid identification; (d) the licensee shall affix a conspicuous notice in 16-point type or larger to the outside of each package of wine or beer that states ‘CONTAINS ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES; SIGNATURE OF PERSON 21 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY’ and includes the licensee number; and (e) no more than four cases of wine or beer may be delivered to any person at one time unless the licensee provides notice to the Board at least one business day prior to the delivery, which notice shall include the name and address of the intended recipient.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 8, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That on or after July 1, 2020, the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may issue mixed beverage carrier licenses to persons operating a common carrier of passengers by bus, which shall authorize the licensee to sell and serve mixed beverages anywhere in the Commonwealth to passengers while in transit aboard any such common carrier. The state license fee for any such license granted prior to January 1, 2022, shall be $190. Such license shall automatically authorize the licensee to obtain a license to sell and serve wine and beer for on-premises consumption; however, the licensee shall be required to pay the local fee required for such additional license. For the purposes of this enactment, ‘bus’ means a motor vehicle that (i) is operated by a common carrier licensed under Chapter 20 ( §

46.2-2000

et seq.) of Title 46.2 of the Code of Virginia to transport passengers for compensation over the highways of the Commonwealth on regular or irregular routes of not less than 100 miles, (ii) seats no more than 24 passengers, (iii) is 40 feet in length or longer, (iv) offers wireless Internet services, (v) is equipped with charging stations at every seat for cellular phones or other portable devices, and (vi) during the transportation of passengers, is staffed by an attendant who has satisfied all training requirements set forth in Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia or Board regulation.”

Acts
2022, c. 201, cl. 3 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Board) shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act. The Board's initial adoption of regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this act shall be exempt from the Administrative Process Act ( §

2.2-4000

et seq. of the Code of Virginia), except that the Board shall provide an opportunity for public comment on such regulations prior to adoption.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 564 substituted “subsection C” for “subsection B” in subdivision 8; substituted “60” for “sixty” in subdivision 11; and added subdivision 14.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 826 inserted the A and B designations and added subdivision A 15.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 453, in subdivision A 11, inserted “to continue to operate the establishment to the same extent as a person holding such licenses for a period not to exceed 60 days or for such longer period as determined by the Board” at the end of the first sentence, in the second sentence, deleted the clause (i) designation and deleted clause (ii), which read: “authorize the permittee to continue to operate the establishment to the same extent as a person holding such licenses for a period not to exceed 60 days or for such longer period as determined by the Board”; and added subdivision A 16.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 155, effective July 1, 2013, substituted “subdivision (a)(73)” for “subdivision (a)(72)” in subdivision A 10.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 617 added subdivision A 17.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 675 added subdivision A 18.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 386 added “for the purpose of distilling alcohol” to subdivision A 5.

The 2020 amendment by c. 816, in subdivision A 18, deleted “culinary” preceding “walking tour” twice, deleted “food and” preceding “alcoholic beverages” in clause (i); inserted clause (ii); substituted “alcoholic beverages and any food” for “food and alcoholic beverages” in the second sentence, deleted the former last sentence, which read: “Food cooked or prepared on the premises of such licensed establishments shall be served at each such establishment on the tour,” and added the present last sentence.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and deleted former subdivision A 12, which read: “The sale of wine and beer in kegs by any person licensed to sell wine or beer, or both, at retail for off-premises consumption,” and renumbered accordingly; and made a stylistic change.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 201 substituted “§

4.1-311

” for “§

4.1-310

” in subdivision A 4.

§ 4.1-212.1.
(Effective until July 1, 2024) Delivery of wine and beer; kegs; regulations of Board.

Any brewery, winery, or farm winery located within or outside the Commonwealth that is authorized to engage in the retail sale of wine or beer for off-premises consumption may deliver the brands of beer, wine, and farm wine produced by the same brewery, winery, or farm winery in closed containers to consumers within the Commonwealth for personal off-premises consumption.

Any person licensed to sell wine and beer at retail for off-premises consumption in the Commonwealth, and who is not a brewery, winery, or farm winery, may deliver the brands of beer, wine, and farm wine it is authorized to sell in closed containers to consumers within the Commonwealth for personal off-premises consumption. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, such deliveries may be made to (i) a person’s vehicle if located in a designated parking area of the licensee’s premises where such person has electronically ordered beer, wine, or farm wine in advance of the delivery or (ii) such other locations as may be permitted by Board regulation.

Any person located outside the Commonwealth who is authorized to sell wine or beer at retail for off-premises consumption in its state of domicile, and who is not a brewery, winery, or farm winery, may apply for a delivery permit that shall authorize the delivery of any brands of beer, wine, and farm wine it is authorized to sell in its state of domicile, in closed containers, to consumers within the Commonwealth for personal off-premises consumption.

Any person licensed to sell mixed beverages at retail for off-premises consumption in the Commonwealth may deliver any mixed beverages it is authorized to sell in closed containers to consumers within the Commonwealth for personal off-premises consumption. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, such deliveries may be made to (i) a person’s vehicle if located in a designated parking area of the licensee’s premises where such person has electronically ordered mixed beverages in advance of the delivery or (ii) such other locations as may be permitted by Board regulation.

Any distiller that has been appointed as an agent of the Board pursuant to subsection D of §

4.1-119

may deliver to consumers within the Commonwealth for personal consumption any alcoholic beverages the distiller is authorized to sell through organized tasting events in accordance with subsection G of §

4.1-119

and Board regulations. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, such deliveries may be made to (i) a person’s vehicle if located in a designated parking area of the licensee’s premises where such person has electronically ordered mixed beverages in advance of the delivery or (ii) such other locations as may be permitted by Board regulation.

All deliveries made pursuant to this section shall be to consumers within the Commonwealth for personal consumption only and not for resale. Such deliveries shall be performed by either (i) the owner or any officer, director, shareholder, or employee of the licensee or permittee or (ii) a third-party delivery licensee pursuant to §

4.1-212.2

. The licensee performing the delivery shall be liable for any administrative violations of this section or §

4.1-304

committed during transport through completion of the delivery. Alcoholic beverages shall not be delivered after 11:00 p.m. or before 6:00 a.m. Only one individual may take possession of the alcoholic beverages during the course of the delivery. No more than four cases of wine nor more than four cases of beer may be delivered at one time to any person in Virginia to whom alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold, except that the licensee or permittee may deliver more than four cases of wine or more than four cases of beer if he notifies the Authority in writing at least one business day in advance of any such delivery, which notice contains the name and address of the intended recipient. Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, alcoholic beverages sold for off-premises consumption or delivered pursuant to this section that are not in the manufacturer’s original sealed container shall (a) be enclosed in a container that has no straw holes or other openings and is sealed in a manner that allows a person to readily discern whether the container has been opened or tampered with subsequent to its original closure; (b) display the name of the licensee from which the alcoholic beverages were purchased; (c) be clearly marked with the phrase “contains alcoholic beverages”; (d) in the case of wine, beer, or, if purchased from a mixed beverage restaurant or limited mixed beverage restaurant licensee, mixed beverages, have a maximum volume of 16 ounces per beverage; and (e) during delivery, be stored (1) in the trunk of the vehicle, (2) in an area that is rear of the driver’s seat, (3) in a locked container or compartment, or (4) in the case of delivery by bicycle, in a compartment behind the bicyclist.

The Board may adopt such regulations as it reasonably deems necessary to implement the provisions of this section. Such regulations shall include provisions that require (A) the recipient to demonstrate, upon delivery, that he is at least 21 years of age and (B) the recipient to sign an electronic or paper form or other acknowledgement of receipt as approved by the Board.

In addition to other applicable requirements set forth in this section, the following provisions shall apply to the sale of mixed beverages for off-premises consumption and the delivery of mixed beverages pursuant to this section:

No distiller shall sell for off-premises consumption or deliver more than two mixed beverages at any one time, and no mixed beverage restaurant or limited mixed beverage restaurant licensee may sell for off-premises consumption or deliver more than four mixed beverages at any one time;

All mixed beverages sold for off-premises consumption or delivered by a mixed beverage restaurant or limited mixed beverage restaurant licensee shall contain at least one mixer; and

Mixed beverage restaurant and limited mixed beverage restaurant licensees shall serve at least one meal with every two mixed beverages sold for off-premises consumption or delivered.

The Board may summarily revoke a licensee’s privileges to sell or deliver mixed beverages for off-premises consumption for noncompliance with the provisions of this section or §

4.1-225

or

4.1-325

. Any summary revocation by the Board pursuant to this paragraph (i) shall not be subject to the provisions of §

4.1-227

, (ii) shall not be subject to appeal, and (iii) shall become effective upon personal service of the notice of summary revocation to the licensee or upon the fourth business day after such notice is mailed to the licensee’s residence or the address listed for the licensed premises on the initial license application.

For purposes of §§

4.1-234

and

4.1-236

and Chapter 6 (§

58.1-600

et seq.) of Title 58.1, each delivery of wine, beer, or mixed beverages by a licensee or permittee shall constitute a sale in Virginia. The licensee or permittee shall collect the taxes due to the Commonwealth and remit any excise taxes monthly to the Authority and any sales taxes to the Department of Taxation, if such taxes have not already been paid.

Any manufacturer or retailer who is licensed to sell wine, beer, or both for off-premises consumption may sell such wine or beer in kegs, subject to any limitations imposed by Board regulation. The Board may impose a fee for keg registration seals. For purposes of this subsection, “keg registration seal” means any document, stamp, declaration, seal, decal, sticker, or device that is approved by the Board, designed to be affixed to kegs, and displays a registration number and such other information as may be prescribed by the Board.

History.

2007, cc. 99, 799; 2015, cc. 38, 730; 2019, c. 706; 2020, cc. 1113, 1114; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281, 282; 2022, cc. 78, 79.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2015, cc. 38 and
730, cl. 4, as amended by Acts
2017, cc. 698 and
707, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 15, 2018, except that the provisions of the (i) thirteenth, fourteenth, and fifteenth enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2015; (ii) third enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2018; and (iii) eleventh enactment of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 7 provides: “That any farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery that, prior to July 1, 2016, (i) holds a valid license granted by the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Board) in accordance with Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia and (ii) is in compliance with the local zoning ordinance as an agricultural district or classification or as otherwise permitted by a locality for farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery use shall be allowed to continue such use as provided in
§

15.2-2307

of the Code of Virginia, notwithstanding (a) the provisions of
§

4.1-206.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, or (b) a subsequent change in ownership of the farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery on or after July 1, 2016, whether by transfer, acquisition, inheritance, or other means. Any such farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery located on land zoned residential conservation prior to July 1, 2016, may expand any existing building or structure and the uses thereof so long as specifically approved by the locality by special exception. Any such farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery located on land zoned residential conservation prior to July 1, 2016, may construct a new building or structure so long as specifically approved by the locality by special exception. All such licensees shall comply with the requirements of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia and Board regulations for renewal of such license or the issuance of a new license in the event of a change in ownership of the farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery on or after July 1, 2016.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cl. 4 provides: “That any person licensed to sell wine or beer for on-premises consumption may sell such wine or beer to persons to whom alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold for off-premises consumption until January 1, 2022, provided that such wine or beer is sold in a (i) container upon which the original seal or closure has not been broken; (ii) growler made of glass, ceramic, metal, or other material approved by the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Board); or (iii) reusable, resealable container approved by the Board. Such on-premises licensee, as well as persons licensed to sell wine or beer for off-premises consumption, may deliver wine or beer that it is authorized to sell to consumers within the Commonwealth without obtaining a delivery permit until January 1, 2022, subject to the following conditions: (a) deliveries shall be performed by (1) the licensee, (2) an agent, officer, director, shareholder, or employee of the licensee, or (3) an independent contractor of the licensee, provided that only one individual takes possession of the wine or beer during the course of the delivery and the licensee has entered into a written agreement with the independent contractor establishing that the licensee is vicariously liable for any administrative violations of this enactment or §

4.1-304

of the Code of Virginia committed by the independent contractor relating to any deliveries made on behalf of the licensee; (b) deliveries may be made without obtaining the recipient’s signature, provided that the person making the delivery records the recipient’s full name and the method used to verify that the recipient is 21 years of age or older; (c) the delivery shall be refused when the recipient appears to be younger than 21 years of age and refuses to present valid identification; (d) the licensee shall affix a conspicuous notice in 16-point type or larger to the outside of each package of wine or beer that states ‘CONTAINS ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES; SIGNATURE OF PERSON 21 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY’ and includes the licensee number; and (e) no more than four cases of wine or beer may be delivered to any person at one time unless the licensee provides notice to the Board at least one business day prior to the delivery, which notice shall include the name and address of the intended recipient.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281 and 282, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2022, cc. 78 and 79, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2024.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281 and 282, cl. 3 provides: “That the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Authority) shall convene a work group to study the sale and delivery of mixed beverages and pre-mixed wine for off-premises consumption. In conducting the study, the work group shall analyze the implementation of the provisions of this act that authorize the sale and delivery of mixed beverages and pre-mixed wine for off-premises consumption, determine whether such provisions should be implemented permanently, and identify any further statutory or regulatory modifications that should be made in the event that such provisions are made permanent. The Authority shall report its findings and recommendations to the Chairmen of the House Committee on General Laws and the Senate Committee on Rehabilitation and Social Services by November 1, 2021.”

Acts 2022, cc. 78 and 79, cl. 3 provides: “That the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority shall collect data regarding the compliance of third-party delivery licensees with the provisions of this act and report such data to the Chairmen of the House Committee on General Laws and the Senate Committee on Rehabilitation and Social Services by November 1, 2023.”

Acts 2022, cc. 78 and 79, cl. 4 provides: “That the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Authority) shall monitor the implementation of the provisions of this act to identify any difficulties of third-party delivery licensees in determining locations to which alcoholic beverages may be delivered and the adequacy of applicable training and education programs. The Board of Directors of the Authority shall promulgate regulations, if necessary, to address any issues identified during such monitoring process.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 38 and 730, effective January 15, 2018, are identical and substituted “Authority” for “Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control” in subsection D.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 706, in subsection C, inserted “either (i)” and added clause (ii) at the end of the second sentence; in subsection D, inserted “if such taxes have not already been paid”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and in subsection A, substituted “deliver” for “apply to the Board for issuance of a delivery permit that shall authorize the delivery of” and inserted the second instance of “off-premises”; rewrote subsection B, which read: “Any person located within or outside the Commonwealth who is authorized to sell wine or beer at retail for off-premises consumption in their state of domicile, and who is not a brewery, winery, or farm winery, may apply for a delivery permit that shall authorize the delivery of any brands of beer, wine, and farm wine it is authorized to sell in its state of domicile, in closed containers, to consumers within the Commonwealth for personal consumption”; inserted subsection C and redesignated accordingly; in subsections D and E, substituted “licensee or permittee” for “permittee” throughout; in subsection D, substituted “the Authority” for “the Department” in the third sentence; added subsection F and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281 and 282, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and added subsections C, D and F and redesignated remaining subsections accordingly; in subsection E, substituted “All deliveries made pursuant to this section” for “All such deliveries” in the first sentence, in the second sentence, substituted “Such deliveries” for “All such deliveries of beer, wine, or farm wine” and substituted “alcoholic beverages” for “beer, wine, or farm wine” in clauses (a) and (b); and in subsection G, inserted “or mixed beverages.” For expiration date, see Editor’s note.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 78 and 79 are identical, and in subsection D, in the first paragraph, substituted “a third-party delivery licensee pursuant to §

4.1-212.2

. The licensee performing the delivery shall be” for “an independent contractor of the licensee or permittee, provided that (a) the licensee or permittee has entered into a written agreement with the independent contractor establishing that the licensee or permittee shall be vicariously,” substituted “during transport through completion of the delivery. Alcoholic beverages shall not be delivered after 11:00 p.m. or before 6:00 a.m. Only one individual may take” for “by the independent contractor relating to any deliveries of beer, wine, or farm wine made on behalf of the licensee or permittee and (b) only one individual takes” and added the last sentence; and in the second paragraph, substituted the (A) and (B) designators for the (1) and (2) designators.